Connecticut, session 2026, HB05141.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 19a-564 of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is amended by adding subsection (h) as follows (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(NEW) (h) Each assisted living services agency licensed under this
section that provides assisted living services in a managed residential
community shall ensure that all agency employees receive annual in-
service training concerning residents' fear of retaliation from employees
or others, including, but not limited to: (1) A discussion of residents'
rights to file complaints and voice grievances; (2) examples of what
might constitute or be perceived as employee retaliation against
residents; and (3) methods of preventing employee retaliation and
alleviating residents' fear of such retaliation. A person conducting such
in-service training shall be familiar with the needs of the resident
population served by the assisted living services agency at such
managed residential community, provided such training need not be
conducted by a qualified social worker or qualified social worker
consultant. For the purposes of this subsection, "assisted living services"

House Bill No. 5141
has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-693.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 20, 2026
Public Act No. 26-44 2 of 2